Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-311 Compensation.
A licensed surplus lines broker may accept and place surplus lines business
from any producer licensed in this State for the class of insurance involved,
and may compensate the producer therefor. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2; am L 2002, c 155, §18]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next